Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4001
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-4001 to 77-4027 shall be known and may be cited as the Tobacco Products Tax Act.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB89, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 88;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 25;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB212, § 1.
January 1, 2027